Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 9.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1233.02
Taxable tangible personal property tax returns; county assessor; duties.

The county assessor with the aid of his or her deputy and assistants shall carefully examine, check, and verify all taxable tangible personal property tax returns. The assessor may make such investigation, examination, and inspection of the property set out in a return and examine under oath the person making the return as to his or her books, records, and papers in order to enable the assessor to determine that all taxable tangible personal property of the taxpayer is listed for taxation at its net book value.

Laws 1947, c. 250, § 39, p. 804;

Laws 1987, LB 508, § 9;

R.S.Supp.,1988, § 77-409;

Laws 1990, LB 821, § 45;

Laws 1992, LB 1063, § 101;

Laws 1992, Second Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 74;

Laws 1997, LB 270, § 52;

Laws 2008, LB965, § 9.